Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB658.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 281A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
In accordance with 49 C.F.R. sec. 383.3(f)(3)(ii), as it existed on the effective date of
this Act, exemptions for restricted CDLs for certain drivers in farm-related service
industries, the cabinet shall promulgate emergency and ordinary administrative
regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to extend the allowable time length
of a limited CDL to the maximum length allowed under 49 C.F.R sec. 383.3(f)(3)(ii), as
it existed on the effective date of this Act.
Section 2. Whereas on September 29, 2022, 49 C.F.R sec. 383.3(f)(3)(ii) was
amended to allow states that issue limited commercial driver's licenses to increase the
allowable usage within a 12-month period from 180 days to 210 days for certain drivers
in farm-related service industries, and the Transportation Cabinet has not taken action to
comply with this federal regulation, an emergency is declared to exist, and this Act takes
effect upon its passage and approval by the Governor or upon its otherwise becoming a
law.
Page 1 of 1
HB065810.100 - 2093 - XXXX 3/2/2026 4:50 PM GA